Utah statutes.
32A-14b-102 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Applicable fine" means the sum of the following imposed or assessed
under this title by the commission for a violation related to a minor:
(a)  a fine; and
(b)  administrative costs of a disciplinary proceeding.
(2)  "Retail licensee" means a person licensed under this title to sell an
alcoholic beverage at retail.
(3)  "Violation related to a minor" means a violation under this title:
(a)   that is, in whole or in part, based on a retail licensee, or an employee
or agent of the retail licensee:
(i)  selling, serving, or otherwise furnishing an alcoholic product to a
minor;
(ii)  purchasing or otherwise obtaining an alcoholic product for a minor;
(iii)  permitting a minor to consume an alcoholic product;
(iv)  permitting a minor to gain admittance to an area into which a minor is
not permitted under this title; or
(v)  offering or providing employment to a minor that under this title may not
be obtained by a minor; and
(b)  if as part of the violation the minor uses proof of age in violation of
Chapter 1, Part 3, Proof of Age.
